Utah statutes.
62A-6-106.   Declaration of capacity to give informed consent -- Hearing.

(1)  A person who desires sterilization but whose capacity to give informed consent is questioned by any interested party may file a petition for declaration of capacity to give informed consent.

(2)  If, after hearing all the relevant evidence, the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person is capable of giving informed consent, the court shall enter an order declaring that the person has the capacity to give informed consent.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

